Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.110

Certified paper copies.

An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document by affirming under penalty of perjury that the paper copy is a complete and accurate copy of the document.

[ 2024 c 188 s 12.]